Massachusetts, session 194th, H3763.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 7E of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting, in line 68, after the word “registrar”, the following words:- , (vii) on 
authorized motor vehicles owned, used, or contracted by the Massachusetts Department of 
Transportation established by section 2 of chapter 6C, in connection with maintenance or 
construction activities in highway work zones, and by the authority of a permit issued by the 
registrar.